Hawaii statutes.
[§174C-9] Proceedings before the commission
concerning water resources. All proceedings before the commission
concerning the enforcement or application of any provision of this chapter or
any rule adopted pursuant thereto, or the issuance, modification, or revocation
of any permit or license under this code by the commission, shall be conducted
in accordance with chapter 91. Hearings regarding particular water resources
shall be conducted on the island where those water resources are located. [L
1987, c 45, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next